Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact

History.

2020 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 128, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.

§ 33-33-401.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact.”

History.

2020 ch. 128, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 128, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.